Indiana, session 2026, HB1139.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2014,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 2. (a) All tangible
property which is subject to assessment shall be assessed on a just
valuation basis and in a uniform and equal manner regardless of:
(1) who owns the tangible property; or
(2) who the person or entity is that is liable for property taxes
due on the tangible property under section 4 of this chapter.
(b) Personal property which is subject to assessment and taxation
shall be assessed annually in the manner prescribed in this article.
(c) Real property which is subject to assessment and taxation shall
be assessed in the manner and at the times prescribed in this article.
(d) This section applies to assessment dates described in section
1.5(a)(2) and 1.5(b)(2) of this chapter. The true tax value of tangible
property that is subject to assessment in a year shall be determined as
2026 IN 1139—LS 6577/DI 134


of the assessment date in that year. Except as otherwise expressly
provided by law enacted after July 1, 2014, a change in use, value,
character, or ownership of tangible property after an assessment date
shall not be considered in determining the true tax value of the tangible
property for that assessment date.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-4-4.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 4.2. (a) The county
assessor of each county shall, before July 1, 2013, and before May 1 of
every fourth year thereafter, prepare and submit to the department of
local government finance a reassessment plan for the county. The
following apply to a reassessment plan prepared and submitted under
this section:
(1) The reassessment plan is subject to approval by the
department of local government finance. The department of local
government finance shall complete its review and approval of the
reassessment plan before:
(A) March 1, 2015; and
(B) January 1 of each subsequent year that follows a year in
which the reassessment plan is submitted by the county.
(2) The department of local government finance shall determine
the classes of real property to be used for purposes of this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (b), the reassessment plan
must divide all parcels of real property in the county into four (4)
different groups of parcels. Each group of parcels must contain
approximately twenty-five percent (25%) of the parcels within
each class of real property in the county.
(4) Except as provided in subsection (b), all real property in each
group of parcels shall be reassessed under the county's
reassessment plan once during each four (4) year cycle.
(5) The reassessment of a group of parcels in a particular class of
real property shall begin on May 1 of a year.
(6) The reassessment of parcels:
(A) must include a physical inspection of each parcel of real
property in the group of parcels that is being reassessed; and
(B) shall be completed on or before January 1 of the year after
the year in which the reassessment of the group of parcels
begins.
(7) For real property included in a group of parcels that is
reassessed, the reassessment is the basis for taxes payable in the
year following the year in which the reassessment is to be
completed.
2026 IN 1139—LS 6577/DI 134


(8) The reassessment plan must specify the dates by which the
assessor must submit land values under section 13.6 of this
chapter to the county property tax assessment board of appeals.
(9) The department may not approve the reassessment plan until
the assessor provides verification that the land values
determination under section 13.6 of this chapter has been
completed.
(10) Subject to review and approval by the department of local
government finance, the county assessor may modify the
reassessment plan.
(11) Upon approval, the county assessor shall, as soon as
possible, post the approved plan on the department's website
and any transparency portal developed by the state regarding
public information.
(b) A county may submit a reassessment plan that provides for
reassessing more than twenty-five percent (25%) of all parcels of real
property in the county in a particular year. A plan may provide that all
parcels are to be reassessed in one (1) year. However, a plan must
cover a four (4) year period. All real property in each group of parcels
shall be reassessed under the county's reassessment plan once during
each reassessment cycle.
(c) The reassessment of the first group of parcels under a county's
reassessment plan shall begin on July 1, 2014, and shall be completed
on or before January 1, 2015.
(d) The department of local government finance may adopt rules to
govern the reassessment of property under county reassessment plans.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-4-4.9, AS ADDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 4.9. (a) This section
applies to an assessment:
(1) under section 4.2 or 4.5 of this chapter or another law; and
(2) occurring after December 31, 2023.
(b) If the township assessor, or the county assessor if there is no
township assessor for the township, changes the underlying parcel
characteristics, including age, grade, or condition, property
classification, or agricultural land type, of a property from the
previous year's assessment date based on verifiable evidence of a
change in use, the township or county assessor shall provide notice to
the property owner that includes all verifiable evidence used to
change assessment methods from agricultural land and document:
(1) each change; and
(2) the reason that each change was made for any class of
2026 IN 1139—LS 6577/DI 134


property.
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-4-13, AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL
CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1,
2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 13. (a) In assessing or reassessing land,
the land shall be assessed as agricultural land only when it is devoted
to agricultural use regardless of:
(1) who owns the land; or
(2) who the person or entity is that is liable for property taxes
due on the land under IC 6-1.1-2-4.
(b) For purposes of this section, and in addition to any other land
considered devoted to agricultural use, any:
(1) land enrolled in:
(A) a farm program of the state or of the United States
Department of Agriculture, including all acreage within an
assigned farm number;
(A) (B) a land conservation or reserve program administered
by the United States Department of Agriculture;
(B) (C) a land conservation program administered by the
United States Department of Agriculture's Farm Service
Agency; or
(C) (D) a conservation reserve program or agricultural
easement program administered by the United States
Department of Agriculture's National Natural Resources
Conservation Service;
(2) land enrolled in the department of natural resources' classified
forest and wildlands program (or any similar or successor
program);
(3) land classified in the category of other agriculture use, as
provided in the department of local government finance's real
property assessment guidelines; or
(4) land devoted to the harvesting of hardwood timber;
is considered to be devoted to agricultural use. Agricultural use for
purposes of this section includes but is not limited to the uses included
in the definition of "agricultural use" in IC 36-7-4-616(b), such as the
production of livestock or livestock products, commercial aquaculture,
equine or equine products, land designated as a conservation reserve
plan, pastureland, poultry or poultry products, horticultural or nursery
stock, fruit, vegetables, forage, grains, timber, trees, bees and apiary
products, tobacco, other agricultural crops, general farming operation
purposes, native timber lands, or land that lays fallow. Agricultural use
may not be determined by the size of a parcel or size of a part of the
2026 IN 1139—LS 6577/DI 134


parcel. This subsection does not affect the assessment of any real
property assessed under IC 6-1.1-6 (assessment of certain forest lands),
IC 6-1.1-6.2 (assessment of certain windbreaks), or IC 6-1.1-6.7
(assessment of filter strips).
(c) The department of local government finance shall give written
notice to each county assessor of:
(1) the availability of the United States Department of
Agriculture's soil survey data; and
(2) the appropriate soil productivity factor for each type or
classification of soil shown on the United States Department of
Agriculture's soil survey map.
All assessing officials and the property tax assessment board of appeals
shall use the data in determining the true tax value of agricultural land.
However, notwithstanding the availability of new soil productivity
factors and the department of local government finance's notice of the
appropriate soil productivity factor for each type or classification of
soil shown on the United States Department of Agriculture's soil survey
map for the March 1, 2012, assessment date, the soil productivity
factors used for the March 1, 2011, assessment date shall be used for
the January 1, 2016, assessment date and each assessment date
thereafter.
(d) The department of local government finance shall by rule
provide for the method for determining the true tax value of each parcel
of agricultural land.
(e) This section does not apply to land purchased for industrial or
commercial uses.
(f) If an assessor changes the underlying parcel characteristics,
including age, grade, condition, property classification, or land
type previously assessed as agricultural land under this section, the
assessor bears the burden of proving that the change in underlying
characteristics is correct.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-4-31, AS AMENDED BY P.L.86-2018,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 31. (a) The department
of local government finance shall periodically check the conduct of:
(1) a reassessment of a group of parcels under a county's
reassessment plan prepared under section 4.2 of this chapter;
(2) work required to be performed by local officials under 50
IAC 21; and
(3) other property assessment activities in the county, as
determined by the department.
The department of local government finance may shall inform
2026 IN 1139—LS 6577/DI 134


township assessors (if any), county assessors, and the presidents of
county councils in writing if its check reveals that the reassessment of
a group of parcels under a county's reassessment plan prepared under
section 4.2 of this chapter, or other property assessment activities are
not being properly conducted, work required to be performed by local
officials under 50 IAC 21 is not being properly conducted, or property
assessments are not being properly made.
(b) The failure of the department of local government finance to
inform local officials under subsection (a) shall not be construed as an
indication by the department that:
(1) a reassessment of a group of parcels under a county's
reassessment plan prepared under section 4.2 of this chapter or
other property assessment activities are being properly conducted;
(2) work required to be performed by local officials under 50
IAC 21 is being properly conducted; or
(3) property assessments are being properly made.
(c) If the department of local government finance:
(1) determines under subsection (a) that a reassessment of a group
of parcels under a county's reassessment plan prepared under
section 4.2 of this chapter or other assessment activities are not
being properly conducted; and
(2) informs:
(A) the township assessor (if any) of each affected township;
(B) the county assessor; and
(C) the president of the county council;
in writing under subsection (a);
the department may shall order a state conducted assessment or
reassessment under section 31.5 of this chapter to begin not less than
sixty (60) days after the date of the notice under subdivision (2).
(d) If the department of local government finance:
(1) determines under subsection (a) that work required to be
performed by local officials under 50 IAC 21 is not being
properly conducted; and
(2) informs:
(A) the township assessor of each affected township (if any);
(B) the county assessor; and
(C) the president of the county council;
in writing under subsection (a);
the department may conduct the work or contract to have the work
conducted to begin not less than sixty (60) days after the date of the
notice under subdivision (2). If the department determines during the
period between the date of the notice under subdivision (2) and the
2026 IN 1139—LS 6577/DI 134


proposed date for beginning the work or having the work conducted
that work required to be performed by local officials under 50 IAC 21
is being properly conducted, the department may rescind the order.
(e) If the department of local government finance contracts to have
work conducted under subsection (d), the department shall forward the
bill for the services to the county and the county shall pay the bill under
the same procedures that apply to county payments of bills for
assessment or reassessment services under section 31.5 of this chapter.
(f) A county council president who is informed by the department
of local government finance under subsection (a) shall provide the
information to the board of county commissioners. A board of county
commissioners that receives information under this subsection may
adopt an ordinance to do either or both of the following:
(1) Determine that:
(A) the information indicates that the county assessor has
failed to perform adequately the duties of county assessor; and
(B) by that failure the county assessor forfeits the office of
county assessor and is subject to removal from office by an
information filed under IC 34-17-2-1(b).
(2) Determine that:
(A) the information indicates that one (1) or more township
assessors in the county have failed to perform adequately the
duties of township assessor; and
(B) by that failure the township assessor or township assessors
forfeit the office of township assessor and are subject to
removal from office by an information filed under
IC 34-17-2-1(b).
(g) A city-county council that is informed by the department of local
government finance under subsection (a) may adopt an ordinance
making the determination or determinations referred to in subsection
(f).
SECTION 6. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1139—LS 6577/DI 134